Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.415

Limitation on certain secured and unsecured loans.

In addition to all other investments and loans authorized for mutual savings banks in this state, a mutual savings bank may invest not more than twenty percent of its funds in secured or unsecured loans on such terms and conditions as the bank may determine.

[ 1981 c 86 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 86: See note following RCW 32.08.140.